Nebraska, session 109, LB279.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB279 LB279
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-399, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-399 (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided, no person
shall operate or park or cause to be operated or parked a motor vehicle
or tow or park or cause to be towed or parked a trailer on the highways
unless such motor vehicle or trailer has at least one license plate
displayed the proper number of plates as required in the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act.
In each registration period in which new license plates are not
issued, previously issued license plates shall have affixed thereto the
validation decals issued pursuant to section 60-3,101. In all cases such
license plates shall be securely fastened in an upright position to the
motor vehicle or trailer so as to prevent such plates from swinging and
at a minimum distance of twelve inches from the ground to the bottom of
the license plate. No person shall attach to or display on such motor
vehicle or trailer any (a) license plate or registration certificate
other than as assigned to it for the current registration period, (b)
fictitious or altered license plates or registration certificate, (c)
license plates or registration certificate that has been canceled by the
department, or (d) license plates lacking current validation decals.
(2) All letters, numbers, printing, writing, and other
identification marks upon such plates and certificate shall be kept clear
and distinct and free from grease, dust, or other blurring matter, so
that they shall be plainly visible at all times during daylight and under
artificial light in the nighttime.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,100 (1) The department shall issue to every person whose motor
vehicle or trailer is registered one or two fully reflectorized license
plates upon which shall be displayed (a) the registration number
consisting of letters and numerals assigned to such motor vehicle or
-2-

LB279 LB279
2025 2025
trailer in figures not less than two and one-half inches nor more than
three inches in height and (b) also the word Nebraska suitably lettered
so as to be attractive. The license plates shall be of a color designated
by the director. The color of the plates shall be changed each time the
license plates are changed. Each time the license plates are changed, the
director shall secure competitive bids for materials pursuant to the
State Procurement Act. Autocycle, motorcycle, minitruck, low-speed
vehicle, and trailer license plate letters and numerals may be one-half
the size of those required in this section.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, two license
plates shall be issued for every motor vehicle.
(b) One license plate shall be issued for (i) apportionable
vehicles, (ii) buses, (iii) dealers, (iv) minitrucks, (v) motorcycles,
other than autocycles, (vi) special interest motor vehicles that use the
special interest motor vehicle license plate authorized by and issued
under section 60-3,135.01, (vii) trailers, and (viii) truck-tractors.
(c)(i) One license plate shall be issued, upon request and
compliance with this subdivision, for any passenger car which is not
manufactured to be equipped with a bracket on the front of the vehicle to
display a license plate. A license decal shall be issued with the license
plate as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision and shall be
displayed on the driver's side of the windshield. In order to request a
single license plate and license decal, there shall be an additional
annual nonrefundable registration fee of fifty dollars plus the cost of
the decal paid to the county treasurer at the time of registration. All
fees collected under this subdivision shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.
(ii) The department shall design, procure, and furnish to the county
treasurers a license decal which shall be displayed as evidence that a
license plate has been obtained under this subdivision. Each county
treasurer shall furnish a license decal to the person obtaining the
-3-

LB279 LB279
2025 2025
plate.
(d) When two license plates are issued only one license plate is
required to , one shall be prominently displayed at all times on the
front and one on the rear of the registered motor vehicle or trailer.
When only one plate is issued, it shall be prominently displayed on the
rear of the registered motor vehicle or trailer. When only one plate is
issued for motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 60-3,198 and
truck-tractors, it shall be prominently displayed on the front of the
apportionable vehicle.
Sec. 3. Original section 60-399, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 60-3,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-